Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-9103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Act:

(1) Corporate governance annual disclosure means a confidential report filed by an insurer or insurance group made in accordance with the requirements of the Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Act;

(2) Director means the Director of Insurance;

(3) Insurance group means those insurers and affiliates included within an insurance holding company system as defined in section 44-2121; and

(4) Insurer has the same meaning as in section 44-103, except that it shall not include agencies, authorities, or instrumentalities of the United States, its possessions and territories, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, or a state or political subdivision of a state.

Laws 2016, LB772, § 3.